Maryland, session 2026, SB0048.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
2–303.
– 1 –

Ch. 600 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(f) (1) Subject to the bylaws, rules, and regulations of the State Board, and
except as provided in paragraph (5) of this subsection, the State Superintendent, or the
State Superintendent’s designee, shall approve or disapprove each:
(i) Proposal for the purchase or sale of any ground, school site, or
building THAT WILL BE USED FOR THE EDUCATION OF STUDENTS;
(ii) Plan or specification for the [remodeling] ADDITION TO OR
RENOVATION of a school building FACILITY if the [remodeling] ADDITION OR
RENOVATION costs more than $1,000,000 $1,250,000 AND WILL AFFECT THE PLAN
CONFIGURATION OF STUDENT–OCCUPIED SPACES;
(iii) Plan or specification for the construction of a new school building;
and
(iv) Change order that costs more than [$50,000] $200,000
$350,000 for the [remodeling] ADDITION TO OR RENOVATION, restoration, or
construction of STUDENT–OCCUPIED SPACES IN a school building OR ON ITS GROUNDS.
4–115.
(b) [With the approval of the State Superintendent, or the State Superintendent’s
designee, each county board may] EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL REQUEST AND
RECEIVE THE APPROVAL OF THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT, OR THE STATE
SUPERINTENDENT’S DESIGNEE, BEFORE THE COUNTY BOARD MAY:
(1) Buy or otherwise acquire land, school sites, or buildings THAT WILL BE
USED FOR THE EDUCATION OF STUDENTS; [and]
(2) Rent[, repair, improve, and] OR build school buildings FACILITIES or
approve contracts for doing so, if the plans conform to the bylaws, rules, and regulations of
the State Board; OR
(3) ADD TO OR RENOVATE SCHOOL BUILDINGS FACILITIES OR
APPROVE CONTRACTS FOR DOING SO, IF THE ADDITION OR RENOVATION:
(I) COSTS MORE THAN $1,000,000 $1,250,000;
(II) WILL AFFECT THE PLAN CONFIGURATION OF
STUDENT–OCCUPIED SPACES; AND
(III) CONFORMS TO THE BYLAWS, RULES, AND REGULATIONS OF
THE STATE BOARD.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 600
4–126.
(e) (3) (i) Projects that use alternative financing methods under this
section and receive State funding shall comply with the following requirements:
2. Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph,
the maximum State [construction allocation] AWARD for each project approved for State
funding;
5–303.
(d) (2) The regulations adopted by the Interagency Commission may contain
requirements for:
(xiii) Methods of payments made by the State under the Public School
Construction Program; [and]
(xiv) The use of a standard statewide computerized maintenance
management system for school facilities maintenance work order tracking and reporting;
AND
(XV) ELIGIBILITY FOR STATE FUNDING FOR CONSTRUCTION
PROJECTS AND SYSTEMIC RENOVATION PROJECTS.
(3) The regulations adopted by the Interagency Commission shall contain
provisions:
(iii) Subject to subsection (l) of this section, providing a method for
establishing a maximum State [ construction allocation] AWARD for each project approved
for State funding;
(j) (4) On or before [March 30] FEBRUARY 28, [June 30] MAY 31,
[September 30] AUGUST 31, and [December 31 of] NOVEMBER 30 each year, the
Interagency Commission shall report to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257
of the State Government Article, and the Department of Legislative Services on the balance
in the fund as of the [reporting date] LAST DAY OF THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING
QUARTER as the result of transfers or reversions required under this subsection and any
expenditures.
5–304.
(b) (1) Before May 1 [of] each year, the Interagency Commission may not
approve public school construction projects that comprise more than 75% of the preliminary
– 3 –

Ch. 600 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
school construction allocation, determined under § 8–113 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article, for the following fiscal year.
(2) [On or before December 31 of each year, the Interagency Commission
shall approve public school construction projects that comprise 75% of the preliminary
school construction allocation, determined under § 8–113 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article, for the following fiscal year.
(3) The Interagency Commission shall establish an appeal process to allow
local jurisdictions to request funding for projects that were not approved by the Interagency
Commission under paragraph (2) of this subsection.
(4)] (I) On or before March 1 [of] each year, the Interagency Commission
shall provide recommendations to the presiding officers and the budget committees of the
General Assembly and the Department of Legislative Services for public school
construction projects that comprise 90% of the school construction allocation included in
the capital budget submitted by the Governor for the following fiscal year.
(II) THE INTERAGENCY COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH AN
APPEAL PROCESS TO ALLOW LOCAL JURISDICTIONS TO REQUEST FUNDING FOR
PROJECTS THAT WERE NOT APPROVED BY THE INTERAGENCY COMMISSION UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
[(5)] (3) On or after May 1 each year, the Interagency Commission shall
approve 100% of the school construction allocation included in the capital budget bill as
enacted.
(4) (I) ON OR BEFORE NOVEMBER 30 EACH YEAR, THE
INTERAGENCY COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE TO EACH COUNTY BOARD AND EACH
LOCAL GOVERNING BODY A REPORT CONTAINING THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION
FOR EACH PROJECT THAT A LOCAL EDUCATION AGENCY HAS REQUESTED FOR
STATE FUNDING IN THE CAPITAL BUDGET BILL:
1. THE STATUS OF THE REQUEST; AND
2. IF AVAILABLE, THE MAXIMUM STATE AWARD
ESTIMATED OR ADOPTED BY THE INTERAGENCY COMMISSION.
(II) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31 AND JANUARY 31 EACH
YEAR, THE INTERAGENCY COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE TO EACH COUNTY BOARD
AND EACH LOCAL GOVERNING BODY A REPORT CONTAINING THE FOLLOWING
INFORMATION FOR EACH PROJECT THAT A LOCAL EDUCATION AGENCY HAS
REQUESTED FOR STATE FUNDING IN THE CAPITAL BUDGET BILL:
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 600
1. THE STATUS OF THE REQUEST;
2. IF AVAILABLE, THE MAXIMUM STATE AWARD
ESTIMATED OR ADOPTED BY THE INTERAGENCY COMMISSION; AND
3. THE PROJECTED 100% CAPITAL AWARD.
5–308.
(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Title 10, Subtitle 3 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article, [this] THE State may not require reimbursement of debt service from
a county for a school that:
(1) Was initially constructed on or before February 1, 1971;
(2) Is no longer used for [school purposes] A PURPOSE THAT IS ELIGIBLE
FOR STATE FUNDING FOR PUBLIC SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION;
(3) Has had title transferred to a county government; and
(4) Is being used for local governmental purposes other than public
education; provided, however, that if a former school building is sold by a county
government the State shall be reimbursed for outstanding debt service, and if more than
10 percent of usable space within a former school is rented for an amount exceeding the
cost of operating and maintaining such space, such rental profit shall be used toward
retiring outstanding bonded indebtedness.
(b) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, this State shall require reimbursement
of outstanding debt service from a county for a school that:
(1) Was constructed under this subtitle;
(2) Was initially constructed or substantially altered by [addition(s)]
ADDITIONS, alterations, or renovations and the cost of the construction at the time of
execution exceeded $100,000 and the work was accomplished after February 1, 1971;
(3) Is no longer used for [school purposes] A PURPOSE THAT IS ELIGIBLE
FOR STATE FUNDING FOR PUBLIC SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION;
(4) Has had title transferred to a county government;
(5) Is being used for local governmental purposes by the State or a county
or by any instrumentality of the State or county other than public education; and
(6) Has outstanding debt which exceeds $5,000.
– 5 –

Ch. 600 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
5–310.
(b) (1) (i) Each fiscal year, the Interagency Commission shall [survey the
condition of] CONDUCT A MAINTENANCE EFFECTIVENESS ASSESSMENT ON school
buildings identified by the Department.
(ii) The Interagency Commission shall include in the [inspections]
ASSESSMENT of individual school buildings[:
1. A process for a local education agency to report any
additional information relevant to the inspection, including a place in the Master Facility
Asset Library System for the local education agency to:
A. Report each year to the Interagency Commission on any
deficiencies in a school building, even if the school building was not inspected in accordance
with paragraph (2) of this subsection in the prior year;
B. Identify spaces in a school building likely to have been
painted with lead paint; and
C. Report certification of the Asbestos Hazard Emergency
Response Act plan for the space; and
2. A] A process to incorporate maintenance data for
individual school buildings.
(2) (i) The Interagency Commission shall conduct [the inspections] A
STATEWIDE FACILITIES ASSESSMENT of individual school buildings [that are necessary
to complete the survey required in paragraph (1) of this subsection].
(ii) THE INTERAGENCY COMMISSION SHALL INCLUDE IN THE
ASSESSMENT OF INDIVIDUAL SCHOOL BUILDINGS A PROCESS FOR A LOCAL
EDUCATION AGENCY TO REPORT, AT LEAST ONCE EVERY 4 YEARS IN ACCORDANCE
WITH A SCHEDULE DEVELOPED BY THE INTERAGENCY COMMISSION, ADDITIONAL
INFORMATION THAT IS RELEVANT TO THE ASSESSMENT, INCLUDING A PLACE IN THE
MASTER FACILITY ASSET LIBRARY SYSTEM FOR THE LOCAL EDUCATION AGENCY
TO:
1. REPORT EACH YEAR, IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
SCHEDULE DEVELOPED BY THE INTERAGENCY COMMISSION, TO THE INTERAGENCY
COMMISSION ON DEFICIENCIES IN A SCHOOL BUILDING, EVEN IF AN ASSESSMENT
OF THE SCHOOL BUILDING WAS NOT COMPLETED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
PARAGRAPH IN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING YEAR;
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 600
2. IDENTIFY SPACES IN A SCHOOL BUILDING LIKELY TO
HAVE BEEN PAINTED WITH LEAD PAINT; AND
3. REPORT CERTIFICATION OF THE ASBESTOS HAZARD
EMERGENCY RESPONSE ACT PLAN FOR THE SPACE.
(III) The [inspections completed under paragraph (1) of this
subsection] STATEWIDE FACILITIES ASSESSMENT shall include DATA PROVIDED BY
LOCAL EDUCATION AGENCIES, AT LEAST ONCE EVERY 4 YEARS IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE SCHEDULE DEVELOPED BY THE INTERAGENCY COMMISSION, ON the
following items for each school building:
1. Temperature;
2. Humidity;
3. Carbon dioxide level;
4. Acoustic levels;
5. Lead paint;
6. Asbestos;
7. Kitchen sanitary equipment;
8. Lighting;
9. Emergency communication system, with respect to
remaining useful life;
10. Health room attributes;
11. Safety equipment in each laboratory space; and
12. The functionality of:
A. Heating, ventilation, and air–conditioning building
systems;
B. Life safety building systems;
C. Roofs; and
– 7 –

Ch. 600 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
D. Any additional critical building systems identified by the
Interagency Commission.
[(iii)] (IV) During an inspection CONDUCTED AS A PART OF THE
STATEWIDE FACILITIES ASSESSMENT, if an item under subparagraph [(ii)1] (III)1
through 6 of this paragraph rises to such a severe level that requires the school to be closed,
the local education agency shall submit a plan to the Interagency Commission on how to
address the issue and the Interagency Commission shall work to prioritize funding to
address the issue.
(3) [The] ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1 EACH YEAR, THE Interagency
Commission shall report to the Governor and, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, the General Assembly[, on or before October 1 of each
year, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article,] on the results of the
[survey] MAINTENANCE EFFECTIVENESS ASSESSMENT for the [prior] IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING fiscal year.
(4) ON OR BEFORE NOVEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, THE INTERAGENCY
COMMISSION SHALL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON THE
RESULTS OF THE STATEWIDE FACILITIES ASSESSMENT FOR THE IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR.
5–314.
(a) (1) Notwithstanding § 2–303(f) of this article, the process for the review
and approval of public school construction projects shall be in accordance with the
provisions of this section.
(2) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO CONSTRUCTION PROJECTS AND
SYSTEMIC RENOVATION PROJECTS THAT COST MORE THAN $1,250,000 AND:
(I) THAT COST MORE THAN $1,000,000 AND:
1. THAT HAVE HAVE RECEIVED STATE FUNDING; OR
2. FOR, OR FOR WHICH A LOCAL EDUCATION AGENCY
WILL BE REQUESTING STATE FUNDING; OR
(II) THAT REPLACE OR CHANGE MAKE CHANGES TO A HEATING,
VENTILATION, OR AIR–CONDITIONING SYSTEM THAT ARE NOT LIKE–FOR–LIKE
REPLACEMENTS OF SYSTEM COMPONENTS.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 600
(3) AT LEAST ONCE EVERY 4 YEARS, THE INTERAGENCY COMMISSION
SHALL REVIEW THE COST THRESHOLD AMOUNT UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(b) (1) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, educational
specifications and schematic designs for [major] APPLICABLE construction projects THAT
WILL AFFECT THE PLAN CONFIGURATION OF STUDENT–OCCUPIED SPACES IN A
SCHOOL BUILDING OR ON ITS GROUNDS are required to:
(i) Be reviewed by the Interagency Commission; and
(ii) Prior to finalization by a local education agency, have any
concerns or recommendations of the Interagency Commission satisfactorily resolved.
(2) To provide efficiency within the process, the Department and the
Interagency Commission shall consider altering the review and approval process required
under paragraph (1) of this subsection, including a rolling deadline for submission of
documents, with schematic designs submitted following the completion of the educational
specifications review.
(c) (1) Change orders for [major] APPLICABLE construction projects and
systemic renovation projects may not be:
(i) Reviewed by the Department of General Services; and
(ii) Approved by the Interagency Commission.
(2) A percentage of the State allocation related to change orders may not
be withheld.
(3) Local education agencies shall maintain contingency funds for each
approved project to address unanticipated construction costs above the State allocation.
(d) (1) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, design and
construction documents for [major] APPLICABLE construction projects and systemic
renovation projects are required to be:
(i) Reviewed by the Department of General Services; and
(ii) Approved by the Interagency Commission.
(2) The Department of General Services and the Interagency Commission,
in consultation with local education agencies, shall develop a timeline for submission,
review, and approval of design and construction documents.
5–319.
– 9 –

Ch. 600 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) On or before [December 31 of] FEBRUARY 28 each year, AS PROVIDED IN §
5–325 OF THIS SUBTITLE, the Interagency Commission shall submit a report on the
number of public school construction and major renovation projects in each jurisdiction that
[use] USED solar technologies OR ALTERNATIVE ENERGY SYSTEMS IN THE
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR to the Governor and, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
5–325.
(c) On or before [December 31] FEBRUARY 28 each year, AS PROVIDED IN §
5–319 OF THIS SUBTITLE, the Interagency Commission shall submit a report to the
General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on the
number of public school construction and major renovation projects in each jurisdiction that
[use] USED SOLAR TECHNOLOGIES OR alternative energy systems IN THE
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 10 –